District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Department of Corrections Deferred Retirement Option Program
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 2 of B26-100, the “Deferred Retirement Option Program Amendment Act
of 2025,” as introduced, is amended as follows:
(a) Subparagraph (b) of paragraph (22) is amended by adding a new sub-subparagraph (iii)
to read as follows:
“(iii) An employee of the Department of Corrections who, at the time of
entering the deferred retirement option program, was covered by the collective bargaining
agreement between the District of Columbia Government Department of Corrections and the
Fraternal Order of Police, Department of Corrections Labor Committee.”.
(b) Paragraph (d)(6) of section 12(h-1) is amended to read as follows:


“(6) Participating eligible members entitled to medical leave pursuant to Section
623 of the Fire and Police Medical Leave and Limited Duty Amendment Act of 2004, effective
September 30, 2004 (D.C. Law 15-194; D.C. Official Code § 5-633); Section 624 of the Fire and
Police Medical Leave and Limited Duty Amendment Act of 2004, effective September 30, 2004
(D.C. Law 15-194; D.C. Official Code § 5-634); or Section 32 of the District of Columbia Family
and Medical Leave Act of 1990, effective October 3, 1990 (D.C. Law 8-181; D.C. Official Code
§32-503) shall cease participation in the DROP after a period of 120 days on medical leave.”
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.